Washington statutes.
RCW 18.310.050

Out-of-state companies—Consent for service of process.

Every company seeking licensure whose headquarters is not based in the state of Washington shall submit, with the application for licensure, an irrevocable consent that service of process upon the controlling person or persons may be made by service on the director if, in an action against the entity in a Washington state court arising out of the entity's activities as an appraisal management company, the plaintiff cannot, in the exercise of due diligence, obtain personal service upon the company.

[ 2010 c 179 s 5.]